test/src/morphology/A-vish_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - viš: # adjectives 144 'eng /est tugev/fin' - full paradigm
     viš+A+Sg+Nom: viš
     viš+A+Sg+Gen: viš
     viš+A+Sg+Par: viššõ
     viš+A+Sg+Dat: viššõn
     viš+A+Sg+Ins: viššõks
     viš+A+Sg+Ill: viššõ
     viš+A+Sg+Ela: viššõst
     viš+A+Pl+Nom: viššõd
     viš+A+Pl+Gen: viššõd
     viš+A+Pl+Par: viššidi
     viš+A+Pl+Dat: viššõdõn
     viš+A+Pl+Ins: viššõdõks
     viš+A+Pl+Ill: viššiz
     viš+A+Pl+Ela: viššist
